Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Disposition

§ 43-21-601.
Scheduling of disposition hearing.

If the child has been adjudicated a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child or an abused child, the youth court shall immediately set a time and place for a disposition hearing which shall be separate, distinct and subsequent to the adjudicatory hearing. The disposition hearing, however, may be held immediately following the adjudicatory hearing unless a continuance is necessary to allow the parties to prepare for their participation in the proceedings.

If the child has been taken into custody, a disposition hearing shall be held within fourteen (14) days after the adjudicatory hearing unless good cause be shown for postponement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 64, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-603.
Disposition hearing procedure.

At the beginning of each disposition hearing, the judge shall inform the parties of the purpose of the hearing.

All testimony shall be under oath unless waived by all parties and may be in narrative form. The court may consider any evidence that is material and relevant to the disposition of the cause, including hearsay and opinion evidence. At the conclusion of the evidence, the youth court shall give the parties an opportunity to present oral argument.

If the child has been adjudicated a delinquent child, before entering a disposition order, the youth court should consider, among others, the following relevant factors:

The nature of the offense;

The manner in which the offense was committed;

The nature and number of a child’s prior adjudicated offenses;

The child’s need for care and assistance;

The child’s current medical history, including medication and diagnosis;

The child’s mental health history, which may include, but not be limited to, the Massachusetts Youth Screening Instrument version 2 (MAYSI-2);

Copies of the child’s cumulative record from the last school of record, including special education records, if applicable;

Recommendation from the school of record based on areas of remediation needed;

Disciplinary records from the school of record; and

Records of disciplinary actions outside of the school setting.

If the child has been adjudicated a child in need of supervision, before entering a disposition order, the youth court should consider, among others, the following relevant factors:

The nature and history of the child’s conduct;

The family and home situation; and

The child’s need of care and assistance.

If the child has been adjudicated a neglected child or an abused child, before entering a disposition order, the youth court shall consider, among others, the following relevant factors:

The child’s physical and mental conditions;

The child’s need of assistance;

The manner in which the parent, guardian or custodian participated in, tolerated or condoned the abuse, neglect or abandonment of the child;

The ability of a child’s parent, guardian or custodian to provide proper supervision and care of a child; and

Relevant testimony and recommendations, where available, from the foster parent of the child, the grandparents of the child, the guardian ad litem of the child, representatives of any private care agency that has cared for the child, the family protection worker or family protection specialist assigned to the case, and any other relevant testimony pertaining to the case.

After consideration of all the evidence and the relevant factors, the youth court shall enter a disposition order that shall not recite any of the facts or circumstances upon which the disposition is based, nor shall it recite that a child has been found guilty; but it shall recite that a child is found to be a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child or an abused child.

If the youth court orders that the custody or supervision of a child who has been adjudicated abused or neglected be placed with the Department of Human Services or any other person or public or private agency, other than the child’s parent, guardian or custodian, the youth court shall find and the disposition order shall recite that:

Reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his own home, but that the circumstances warrant his removal and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; or

The circumstances are of such an emergency nature that no reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his own home, and that there is no reasonable alternative to custody; and

That the effect of the continuation of the child’s residence within his own home would be contrary to the welfare of the child and that the placement of the child in foster care is in the best interests of the child; or

Reasonable efforts to maintain the child within his home shall not be required if the court determines that:

The parent has subjected the child to aggravated circumstances, including, but not limited to, abandonment, torture, chronic abuse and sexual abuse; or

The parent has been convicted of murder of another child of that parent, voluntary manslaughter of another child of that parent, aided or abetted, attempted, conspired or solicited to commit that murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony assault that results in the serious bodily injury to the surviving child or another child of that parent; or

The parental rights of the parent to a sibling have been terminated involuntarily; and

That the effect of the continuation of the child’s residence within his own home would be contrary to the welfare of the child and that placement of the child in foster care is in the best interests of the child.

Once the reasonable efforts requirement is bypassed, the court shall have a permanency hearing under Section 43-21-613 within thirty (30) days of the finding.

Upon a written motion by a party, the youth court shall make written findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which it relies for the disposition order. If the disposition ordered by the youth court includes placing the child in the custody of a training school, an admission packet shall be prepared for the child that contains the following information:

The child’s current medical history, including medications and diagnosis;

The child’s mental health history;

Copies of the child’s cumulative record from the last school of record, including special education records, if reasonably available;

Recommendation from the school of record based on areas of remediation needed;

Disciplinary records from the school of record; and

Records of disciplinary actions outside of the school setting, if reasonably available.

Only individuals who are permitted under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) shall have access to a child’s medical records which are contained in an admission packet. The youth court shall provide the admission packet to the training school at or before the child’s arrival at the training school. The admittance of any child to a training school shall take place between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 3:00 p.m. on designated admission days.

When a child in the jurisdiction of the Youth Court is committed to the custody of the Mississippi Department of Human Services and is believed to be in need of treatment for a mental or emotional disability or infirmity, the Department of Human Services shall file an affidavit alleging that the child is in need of mental health services with the Youth Court. The Youth Court shall refer the child to the appropriate community mental health center for evaluation pursuant to Section 41-21-67. If the prescreening evaluation recommends residential care, the Youth Court shall proceed with civil commitment pursuant to Sections 41-21-61 et seq., 43-21-315 and 43-21-611, and the Department of Mental Health, once commitment is ordered, shall provide appropriate care, treatment and services for at least as many adolescents as were provided services in fiscal year 2004 in its facilities.

Any screening and assessment examinations ordered by the court may aid in dispositions related to delinquency, but no statements or admissions made during the course thereof may be admitted into evidence against the child on the issue of whether the child committed a delinquent act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 65; Laws, 1985, ch. 486, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 13; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 12; Laws, 1999, ch. 569, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 443, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 489, § 5; Laws, 2004, ch. 549, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 535, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 6; Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-605.
Disposition alternatives in delinquency cases.

In delinquency cases, the disposition order may include any of the following alternatives:

Release the child without further action;

Place the child in the custody of the parents, a relative or other persons subject to any conditions and limitations, including restitution, as the youth court may prescribe;

Place the child on probation subject to any reasonable and appropriate conditions and limitations, including restitution, as the youth court may prescribe;

Order terms of treatment calculated to assist the child and the child’s parents or guardian which are within the ability of the parent or guardian to perform and which are not in conflict with a provider’s determination of medical necessity;

Order terms of supervision which may include participation in a constructive program of service or education or civil fines not in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or restitution not in excess of actual damages caused by the child to be paid out of his own assets or by performance of services acceptable to the victims and approved by the youth court and reasonably capable of performance within one (1) year;

Suspend the child’s driver’s license by taking and keeping it in custody of the court for not more than one (1) year;

Give legal custody of the child to any of the following:

The Department of Human Services for appropriate placement; or

Any public or private organization, preferably community-based, able to assume the education, care and maintenance of the child, which has been found suitable by the court; or

The Division of Youth Services for placement in the least restrictive environment, except that no child under the age of ten (10) years shall be committed to the state training school. Only a child who has been adjudicated delinquent for a felony may be committed to the training school. In the event a child is committed to the Oakley Youth Development Center by the court, the child shall be deemed to be committed to the custody of the Department of Human Services which may place the child in the Oakley Youth Development Center or another appropriate facility.

The training school may retain custody of the child until the child’s twentieth birthday but for no longer. When the child is committed to the training school, the child shall remain in the legal custody of the training school until the child has made sufficient progress in treatment and rehabilitation and it is in the best interest of the child to release the child. However, the superintendent of the state training school, in consultation with the treatment team, may parole a child at any time he or she may deem it in the best interest and welfare of such child. Ten (10) business days before the parole, the training school shall notify the committing court of the pending release. This notice may be made in less than ten (10) days if Oakley Youth Development Center needs to manage population limitations. The youth court may then arrange subsequent placement after a reconvened disposition hearing, except that the youth court may not recommit the child to the training school or any other secure facility without an adjudication of a new offense or probation or parole violation. The Department of Human Services shall ensure that staffs create transition planning for youth leaving the facilities. Plans shall include providing the youth and his or her parents or guardian with copies of the youth’s training school education and health records, information regarding the youth’s home community, referrals to mental and counseling services when appropriate, and providing assistance in making initial appointments with community service providers. Before assigning the custody of any child to any private institution or agency, the youth court through its designee shall first inspect the physical facilities to determine that they provide a reasonable standard of health and safety for the child. No child shall be placed in the custody of the state training school for a status offense or for contempt of or revocation of a status offense adjudication unless the child is contemporaneously adjudicated for having committed an act of delinquency that is not a status offense. A disposition order rendered under this subparagraph shall meet the following requirements:

1. The disposition is the least restrictive alternative appropriate to the best interest of the child and the community;

2. The disposition allows the child to be in reasonable proximity to the family home community of each child given the dispositional alternatives available and the best interest of the child and the state; and

3. The disposition order provides that the court has considered the medical, educational, vocational, social and psychological guidance, training, social education, counseling, substance abuse treatment and other rehabilitative services required by that child as determined by the court;

Recommend to the child and the child’s parents or guardian that the child attend and participate in the Youth Challenge Program under the Mississippi National Guard, as created in Section 43-27-203, subject to the selection of the child for the program by the National Guard; however, the child must volunteer to participate in the program. The youth court shall not order any child to apply for or attend the program;

Adjudicate the juvenile to the Statewide Juvenile Work Program if the program is established in the court’s jurisdiction. The juvenile and his or her parents or guardians must sign a waiver of liability in order to participate in the work program. The judge will coordinate with the youth services counselors as to placing participants in the work program as follows:

The severity of the crime, whether or not the juvenile is a repeat offender or is a felony offender will be taken into consideration by the judge when adjudicating a juvenile to the work program. The juveniles adjudicated to the work program will be supervised by police officers or reserve officers. The term of service will be from twenty-four (24) to one hundred twenty (120) hours of community service. A juvenile will work the hours to which he or she was adjudicated on the weekends during school and weekdays during the summer. Parents are responsible for a juvenile reporting for work. Noncompliance with an order to perform community service will result in a heavier adjudication. A juvenile may be adjudicated to the community service program only two (2) times;

The judge shall assess an additional fine on the juvenile which will be used to pay the costs of implementation of the program and to pay for supervision by police officers and reserve officers. The amount of the fine will be based on the number of hours to which the juvenile has been adjudicated;

Order the child to participate in a youth court work program as provided in Section 43-21-627;

Order terms of house arrest under the intensive supervision program as created in Sections 47-5-1001 through 47-5-1015. The Department of Human Services shall take bids for the placement of juveniles in the intensive supervision program. The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules regarding the supervision of juveniles placed in the intensive supervision program. For each county there shall be seventy-five (75) slots created in the intensive supervision program for juveniles. Any youth ordered into the intensive home-based supervision program shall receive comprehensive strength-based needs assessments and individualized treatment plans. Based on the assessment, an individualized treatment plan shall be developed that defines the supervision and programming that is needed by a youth. The treatment plan shall be developed by a multidisciplinary team that includes the family of the youth whenever possible. The juvenile shall pay Ten Dollars ($10.00) to offset the cost of administering the alcohol and drug test. The juvenile must attend school, alternative school or be in the process of working toward a High School Equivalency Diploma certificate;

Order the child into a juvenile detention center operated by the county or into a juvenile detention center operated by any county with which the county in which the court is located has entered into a contract for the purpose of housing delinquents. The time period for detention cannot exceed ninety (90) days, and any detention exceeding forty-five (45) days shall be administratively reviewed by the youth court no later than forty-five (45) days after the entry of the order. At that time the youth court counselor shall review the status of the youth in detention and shall report any concerns to the court. The youth court judge may order that the number of days specified in the detention order be served either throughout the week or on weekends only. No first-time nonviolent youth offender shall be committed to a detention center for a period in excess of ninety (90) days until all other options provided for in this section have been considered and the court makes a specific finding of fact by a preponderance of the evidence by assessing what is in the best rehabilitative interest of the child and the public safety of communities and that there is no reasonable alternative to a nonsecure setting and therefore commitment to a detention center is appropriate.

If a child is committed to a detention center for ninety (90) days, the disposition order shall meet the following requirements:

1. The disposition order is the least restrictive alternative appropriate to the best interest of the child and the community;

2. The disposition order allows the child to be in reasonable proximity to the family home community of each child given the dispositional alternatives available and the best interest of the child and the state; and

3. The disposition order provides that the court has considered the medical, educational, vocational, social and psychological guidance, training, social education, counseling, substance abuse treatment and other rehabilitative services required by that child as determined by the court;

The judge may consider house arrest in an intensive supervision program as a reasonable prospect of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice system. The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules regarding the supervision of juveniles placed in the intensive supervision program;

Referral to A-team provided system of care services; or

Place the child on electronic monitoring subject to any conditions and limitations as the youth court may prescribe.

If a disposition order requires that a child miss school due to other placement, the youth court shall notify a child’s school while maintaining the confidentiality of the youth court process. If a disposition order requires placement of a child in a juvenile detention facility, the facility shall comply with the educational services and notification requirements of Section 43-21-321.

In addition to any of the disposition alternatives authorized under subsection (1) of this section, the disposition order in any case in which the child is adjudicated delinquent for an offense under Section 63-11-30 shall include an order denying the driver’s license and driving privileges of the child as required under Section 63-11-30(9).

If the youth court places a child in a state-supported training school, the court may order the parents or guardians of the child and other persons living in the child’s household to receive counseling and parenting classes for rehabilitative purposes while the child is in the legal custody of the training school. A youth court entering an order under this subsection (4) shall utilize appropriate services offered either at no cost or for a fee calculated on a sliding scale according to income unless the person ordered to participate elects to receive other counseling and classes acceptable to the court at the person’s sole expense.

Fines levied under this chapter shall be paid into the general fund of the county but, in those counties wherein the youth court is a branch of the municipal government, it shall be paid into the municipal treasury.

Any institution or agency to which a child has been committed shall give to the youth court any information concerning the child as the youth court may at any time require.

The youth court shall not place a child in another school district who has been expelled from a school district for the commission of a violent act. For the purpose of this subsection, “violent act” means any action which results in death or physical harm to another or an attempt to cause death or physical harm to another.

The youth court may require drug testing as part of a disposition order. If a child tests positive, the court may require treatment, counseling and random testing, as it deems appropriate. The costs of such tests shall be paid by the parent, guardian or custodian of the child unless the court specifically finds that the parent, guardian or custodian is unable to pay.

The Mississippi Department of Human Services, Division of Youth Services, shall operate and maintain services for youth adjudicated delinquent at the Oakley Youth Development Center. The program shall be designed for children committed to the training schools by the youth courts. The purpose of the program is to promote good citizenship, self-reliance, leadership and respect for constituted authority, teamwork, cognitive abilities and appreciation of our national heritage. The program must use evidenced-based practices and gender-specific programming and must develop an individualized and specific treatment plan for each youth. The Division of Youth Services shall issue credit towards academic promotions and high school completion. The Division of Youth Services may award credits to each student who meets the requirements for a general education development certification. The Division of Youth Services must also provide to each special education eligible youth the services required by that youth’s individualized education plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 66; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 23; Laws, 1993, ch. 560, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 473, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 607, § 6; Laws, 1995, ch. 540, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 563, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 407, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 329, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 581, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 471, § 6; Laws, 2005, ch. 535, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 539, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 568, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 481, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 555, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 559, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 554, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 398, § 11; Laws, 2014, ch. 462, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 43-21-607.
Dispositional alternatives in children in need of supervision cases.

In children in need of supervision cases, the disposition order may include any of the following alternatives or combination of the following alternatives, giving precedence in the following sequence:

Release the child without further action;

Place the child in the custody of the parent, a relative or other person subject to any conditions and limitations as the youth court may prescribe;

Place the child under youth court supervision subject to any conditions and limitations the youth court may prescribe;

Order terms of treatment calculated to assist the child and the child’s parent, guardian or custodian which are within the ability of the parent, guardian or custodian to perform;

Order terms of supervision which may include participation in a constructive program of service or education or restitution not in excess of actual damages caused by the child to be paid out of his own assets or by performance of services acceptable to the parties and reasonably capable of performance within one (1) year;

Give legal custody of the child to any of the following but in no event to any state training school;

The Department of Human Services for appropriate placement which may include a wilderness training program; or

Any private or public organization, preferably community-based, able to assume the education, care and maintenance of the child, which has been found suitable by the court. Prior to assigning the custody of any child to any private institution or agency, the youth court through its designee shall first inspect the physical facilities to determine that they provide a reasonable standard of health and safety for the child; or

Order the child to participate in a youth court work program as provided in Section 43-21-627.

The court may order drug testing as provided in Section 43-21-605(6).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 67; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 24; Laws, 1994, ch. 473, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 407, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 581, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 43-21-609.
Dispositional alternatives in neglect and abuse cases.

In neglect and abuse cases, the disposition order may include any of the following alternatives, giving precedence in the following sequence:

Release the child without further action;

Place the child in the custody of his parents, a relative or other person subject to any conditions and limitations as the court may prescribe. If the court finds that temporary relative placement, adoption or foster care placement is inappropriate, unavailable or otherwise not in the best interest of the child, durable legal custody may be granted by the court to any person subject to any limitations and conditions the court may prescribe; such durable legal custody will not take effect unless the child or children have been in the physical custody of the proposed durable custodians for at least six (6) months under the supervision of the Department of Human Services. The requirements of Section 43-21-613 as to disposition review hearings do not apply to those matters in which the court has granted durable legal custody. In such cases, the Department of Human Services shall be released from any oversight or monitoring responsibilities;

(i) Grant durable legal relative guardianship to a relative or fictive kin licensed as a foster parent if the licensed relative foster parent or licensed fictive kin foster parent exercised physical custody of the child for at least six (6) months before the grant of durable legal relative guardianship and the Department of Child Protection Services had legal custody or exercised supervision of the child for at least six (6) months. In order to establish durable legal relative guardianship, the youth court must find the following:

1. That both reunification and adoption have been determined to be inappropriate;

2. That the relative guardian or fictive kin guardian shows full commitment to the care, shelter, education, nurture, and reasonable medical care of the child; and

3. That the youth court consulted with any child twelve (12) years of age or older before granting durable legal relative guardianship.

The requirements of Section 43-21-613 as to disposition review hearings do not apply to a hearing concerning durable legal relative guardianship. However, the Department of Child Protection Services must conduct an annual review and recertification of the durable legal relative guardianship to determine whether it remains in the best interest of the child. If a material change in circumstances occurs adverse to the best interest of the child, the parent, relative guardian, fictive kin guardian, or Department of Child Protection Services may petition the court to review the durable legal relative guardianship;

Order terms of treatment calculated to assist the child and the child’s parent, guardian or custodian which are within the ability of the parent, guardian or custodian to perform;

Order youth court personnel, the Department of Child Protection Services or child care agencies to assist the child and the child’s parent, guardian or custodian to secure social or medical services to provide proper supervision and care of the child;

Give legal custody of the child to any of the following but in no event to any state training school:

The Department of Child Protection Services for appropriate placement; or

Any private or public organization, preferably community-based, able to assume the education, care and maintenance of the child, which has been found suitable by the court. Prior to assigning the custody of any child to any private institution or agency, the youth court through its designee shall first inspect the physical facilities to determine that they provide a reasonable standard of health and safety for the child;

If the court makes a finding that custody is necessary as defined in Section 43-21-301(3)(b), and that the child, in the action pending before the youth court had not previously been taken into custody, the disposition order shall recite that the effect of the continuation of the child’s residing within his or her own home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, that the placement of the child in foster care is in the best interests of the child, and unless the reasonable efforts requirement is bypassed under Section 43-21-603(7)(c), the order also must state:

That reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his or her own home, but that the circumstances warrant his or her removal, and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; or

The circumstances are of such an emergency nature that no reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his or her own home, and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; or

If the court makes a finding in accordance with (ii) of this paragraph, the court shall order that reasonable efforts be made towards the reunification of the child with his or her family; or

If the court had, before the disposition hearing in the action pending before the court, taken the child into custody, the judge or referee shall determine, and the youth court order shall recite that reasonable efforts were made by the Department of Child Protection Services to finalize the child’s permanency plan that was in effect on the date of the disposition hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 68; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 25; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 7; Laws, 1999, ch. 569, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 417, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 427, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 43-21-611.
Dispositional alternatives for children in need of special care.

If the youth court finds at the disposition hearing that a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child, an abused child or a dependent child is also a child in need of special care, the youth court may, in its discretion, make any appropriate additional disposition designed for the treatment of the disability or infirmity, which may include civil commitment to a state institution providing care for that disability or infirmity. Any commitment, including one to a Department of Mental Health facility, ordered pursuant to this section shall be in compliance with the requirements for civil commitment as set forth in Section 41-21-61 et seq. Discharge from a Department of Mental Health facility shall be made pursuant to the provisions of Section 41-21-87. Nothing contained in this section shall require any state institution, department or agency to provide any service, treatment or facility if said service, treatment or facility is not available, nor shall this section be construed to authorize the youth court to overrule an expulsion or suspension decision of appropriate school authorities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 73; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 26; Laws, 1985, ch. 486, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 322 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992).

§ 43-21-613.
Modification of disposition orders, probation or parole.

If the youth court finds, after a hearing which complies with the sections governing adjudicatory hearings, that the terms of a delinquency or child in need of supervision disposition order, probation or parole have been violated, the youth court may, in its discretion, revoke the original disposition and make any disposition which it could have originally ordered. The hearing shall be initiated by the filing of a petition that complies with the sections governing petitions in this chapter and that includes a statement of the youth court’s original disposition order, probation or parole, the alleged violation of that order, probation or parole, and the facts which show the violation of that order, probation or parole. Summons shall be served in the same manner as summons for an adjudicatory hearing.

On motion of a child or a child’s parent, guardian or custodian, the youth court may, in its discretion, conduct an informal hearing to review the disposition order. If the youth court finds a material change of circumstances relating to the disposition of the child, the youth court may modify the disposition order to any appropriate disposition of equal or greater precedence which the youth court could have originally ordered.

Unless the youth court’s jurisdiction has been terminated, all disposition orders for supervision, probation or placement of a child with an individual or an agency shall be reviewed by the youth court judge or referee at least annually to determine if continued placement, probation or supervision is in the best interest of the child or the public. For children who have been adjudicated abused or neglected, the youth court shall conduct a permanency hearing within twelve (12) months after the earlier of:

An adjudication that the child has been abused or neglected; or

The date of the child’s removal from the allegedly abusive or neglectful custodian/parent. Notice of such hearing shall be given in accordance with the provisions of Section 43-21-505(5). In conducting the hearing, the judge or referee shall require a written report and may require information or statements from the child’s youth court counselor, parent, guardian or custodian, which includes, but is not limited to, an evaluation of the child’s progress and recommendations for further supervision or treatment. The judge or referee shall, at the permanency hearing determine the future status of the child, including, but not limited to, whether the child should be returned to the parent(s) or placed with suitable relatives, placed for adoption, placed for the purpose of establishing durable legal custody or should, because of the child’s special needs or circumstances, be continued in foster care on a permanent or long-term basis. If the child is in an out-of-state placement, the hearing shall determine whether the out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and in the best interest of the child. At the permanency hearing the judge or referee shall determine, and the youth court order shall recite that reasonable efforts were made by the Department of Child Protection Services to finalize the child’s permanency plan that was in effect on the date of the permanency hearing. The judge or referee may find that reasonable efforts to maintain the child within his home shall not be required in accordance with Section 43-21-603(7)(c), and that the youth court shall continue to conduct permanency hearings for a child who has been adjudicated abused or neglected, at least annually thereafter, for as long as the child remains in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services.

The court may find that the filing of a termination of parental rights petition is not in the child’s best interest if:

The child is being cared for by a relative; and/or

The Department of Child Protection Services has documented compelling and extraordinary reasons why termination of parental rights would not be in the best interests of the child.

The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to review of cases involving a dependent child; however, such reviews shall take place not less frequently than once each one hundred eighty (180) days, or upon the request of the child’s attorney, a parent’s attorney, or a parent as deemed appropriate by the youth court in protecting the best interests of the child. A dependent child shall be ordered by the youth court judge or referee to be returned to the custody and home of the child’s parent, guardian or custodian unless the judge or referee, upon such review, makes a written finding that the return of the child to the home would be contrary to the child’s best interests.

Reviews are not to be conducted unless explicitly ordered by the youth court concerning those cases in which the court has granted durable legal custody. In such cases, the Department of Child Protection Services shall be released from any oversight or monitoring responsibilities, and relieved of physical and legal custody and supervision of the child.

The provisions of this section do not apply to proceedings concerning durable legal relative guardianship.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 69; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 27; Laws, 1985, ch. 486, § 8; Laws, 1996, ch. 409, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 14; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 8; Laws, 1999, ch. 569, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 417, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 427, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-615.
Costs of conveying and treatment.

The costs of conveying any child committed to any institution or agency shall be paid by the county or municipality from which the child is committed out of the general treasury of the county or municipality upon approval of the court. No compensation shall be allowed beyond the actual and necessary expenses of the child and the person actually conveying the child. In the case of a female child, the youth court shall designate some suitable woman to accompany her to the institution or agency.

Whenever a child is adjudicated delinquent and committed by the youth court to the custody of any person or agency other than the custody of a state training school, the youth court, after giving the responsible parent or guardian a reasonable opportunity to be heard, may order that the parent or guardian pay, upon such terms or conditions as the youth court may direct, such sum or sums as will cover, in whole or in part, the support of the child including any necessary medical treatment. The parent shall be provided an itemized bill of all costs and shall be given an opportunity to request an adjustment of the costs. If the parent or guardian shall willfully fail or refuse to pay such sum, he may be proceeded against for contempt of court as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 71; Laws, 2013, ch. 552, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.